Montana, session 2025, HB925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 8] may be cited as the "Social Media
Youth Protection Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) the state has a compelling interest in safeguarding the well-being and privacy of minors
in the state;
(2) the state has enacted safeguards around products and activities that pose risks to minors,
including regulations on motor vehicles, medications, and products and services targeted to children;
(3) minors are particularly vulnerable to manipulation by the use of curation algorithms and the
engagement-driven design elements of social media companies;
(4) a minor's excessive use of an algorithmically curated social media service is likely to cause
adverse mental health outcomes, regardless of the content being viewed;
(5) the addictive design features of certain social media services contribute to excessive use of a
social media service by minors, impacting sleep patterns, mental and physical health, and academic
performance;
(6) prolonged and unregulated social media use has been linked to adverse effects on the mental
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
health of minors, including increased rates of anxiety, depression, and social isolation;
(7) the proliferation of social media services has led to the widespread collection and utilization of
personal information, exposing minors to potential harms related to privacy and identity;
(8) algorithmically curated social media services are designed without sufficient tools to ensure
adequate parental oversight, exposing minors to risks that could be mitigated with additional parental control;
(9) existing measures employed by social media companies to protect minors have proven
insufficient;
(10) the state has a compelling interest to protect minors from the adverse outcomes linked to the
excessive use of algorithmically curated social media services; and
(11) the state should ensure that minors' personal data is given special protection, as minors may
have less awareness of the risks, consequences, and safeguards related to a social media company's
processing of minors' personal data.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 8], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Account holder" means a person who has, creates, or opens an account or profile to use a
social media service.
(2) "Adverse mental health outcome" means a condition affecting a minor's mental health that:
(a) is diagnosable by a licensed mental health care provider; and
(b) is acknowledged by professional mental health experts as having a negative impact on a
minor's well-being. The term includes depression, anxiety, suicidal thoughts or behaviors, and self-harm
thoughts or behaviors.
(3) "Age-assurance system" means measures reasonably calculated to enable a social media
company to identify whether a current or prospective account holder is a minor with an accuracy rate of at least
95%.
(4) "Algorithmically curated social media service" means a social media service that drives user
engagement primarily through the use of:
(a) a curation algorithm; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
(b) engagement-driven design elements.
(5) "Connected account" means an account on a social media service that is directly connected to:
(a) the account of the minor account holder; or
(b) an account that is directly connected to an account that is directly connected to the account of
the minor account holder.
(6) "Content" means any information, visual depictions, tools, features, links, software, or other
materials that appear on or are available or enabled through a social media service.
(7) (a) "Curation algorithm" means a computational process or set of rules designed to encourage
prolonged or frequent engagement that is used by a social media service to determine, influence, or
personalize:
(i) the content a user views;
(ii) the order in which content is displayed;
(iii) how prominently content is displayed; and
(iv) the manner in which content is displayed.
(b) The term does not include the curation of:
(i) responses to specific user queries or user prompts requesting content related to defined topics
or interests selected by the user;
(ii) content to ensure that only age-appropriate material is provided to a user based on the user's
age;
(iii) content that prevents a minor from viewing violent, bullying, threatening, or harassing content;
or
(iv) content to comply with any state or federal law restricting the display of material harmful to
minors.
(8) "Engagement-driven design element" means:
(a) autoplay features that continuously play content without requiring user interaction;
(b) scroll or pagination that loads additional content as long as the user continues scrolling; or
(c) push notifications.
(9) "Excessive use" means the use of a social media service by a minor to an extent that the use
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
substantially interferes with the minor's normal functioning in:
(a) academic performance;
(b) sleep;
(c) in-person relationships;
(d) mental health; or
(e) physical health.
(10) "Minor" means an individual who is under 18 years of age and who:
(a) has not been granted an order of limited emancipation by a court pursuant to 41-1-503; or
(b) has not been married.
(11) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of a minor
child.
(12) "Personal information" means information that is linked or can be reasonably linked to an
identified individual or an identifiable individual. The term includes a person's:
(a) first and last name;
(b) date of birth;
(c) home or physical address, including street name and city;
(d) screen name or username that reveals an individual's email address, first name, or last name;
(e) telephone number;
(f) social security number;
(g) photograph, video, or audio file containing a person's image or voice;
(h) geolocation information sufficient to identify the street name and city; and
(i) any other identifier that a person may use to contact a specific individual.
(13) "Push notification" means an automatic electronic message that is displayed on an account
holder's device when the user interface for the social media service is not actively open or visible on the device
and that prompts the account holder to repeatedly check and engage with the social media service.
(14) "Social media company" means an entity that owns or operates a social media service.
(15) "Social media service" means a public website or application that:
(a) displays content that is primarily generated by account holders and not by the social media
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
company;
(b) permits an individual to register as an account holder and create a profile that is made visible to
the general public or a set of other users defined by the account holder;
(c) connects account holders to allow users to interact socially with each other within the website
or application;
(d) makes available to each account holder a list or lists of other account holders with whom the
account holder shares a connection within the system; and
(e) allows account holders to post content viewable by other users.
(16) "User" means an individual who accesses or uses a social media service.
(17) "Verifiable parental consent" means authorization that a parent provides for a social media
service to collect, use, and disclose personal information of a minor account holder and that complies with the
following verifiability requirements:
(a) the social media service shall provide advance notice to the parent describing information
practices related to the minor account holder's personal information; and
(b) the social media service must receive confirmation that the parent received the notice
described in subsection (17)(a).

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Age assurance required. (1) A social media company shall implement
an age-assurance system to determine whether a current or prospective account holder on the social media
company's social media service is a minor.
(2) An account holder that the social media company identifies as a minor through the use of an
age-assurance system is subject to the requirements in [sections 5 and 6].
(3) A social media company shall:
(a) implement a review process allowing account holders to appeal the account holder's age
designation by submitting documentary evidence to establish the account holder's age range; and
(b) review evidence submitted by the account holder and make a determination within 30 days of
submission of the evidence.
(4) A social media company shall segregate any personal information gathered specifically within
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
the age-assurance system and may not use the personal information for any purposes other than those listed in
[section 7(4)(a) through (4)(f)].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Requirements for minor account holders. For minor account holders
on a social media service, a social media company shall:
(1) set default privacy settings to prioritize maximum privacy, including settings that:
(a) restrict the visibility of a minor account holder's account to only connected accounts;
(b) limit the minor account holder's ability to share content to only connected accounts;
(c) restrict any data collection and sale of data from a minor account holder's account that is not
required for core functioning of the social media service;
(d) disable search engine indexing of the profiles of minor account holders;
(e) restrict a minor account holder's direct messaging capabilities to only allow direct messaging to
connected accounts; and
(f) allow a minor account holder to download a file with all information associated with the minor
account holder's account;
(2) implement and maintain reasonable security measures, including data encryption, to protect
the confidentiality, security, and integrity of personal information collected from a minor account holder;
(3) provide an easily accessible and understandable notice that:
(a) describes any information the social media company collects from a minor account holder; and
(b) explains how the information may be used or disclosed;
(4) upon request by a minor account holder:
(a) delete the personal information of the minor account holder, unless the information is required
to be retained under a provision of state or federal law; and
(b) remove any information or material the minor account holder made publicly available through
the social media service; and
(5) disable the following features that prolong user engagement:
(a) autoplay functions that continuously play content without user interaction;
(b) scroll or pagination that loads additional content as long as the user continues scrolling; and
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
(c) push notifications prompting repeated user engagement.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Supervisory tools. (1) A social media company shall offer supervisory
tools for a minor account holder that the minor account holder may decide to activate.
(2) The supervisory tools described in subsection (1) must include capabilities for an individual
selected by the minor account holder to:
(a) set time limits for the minor account holder's daily social media service usage across devices;
(b) schedule mandatory breaks for the minor account holder during selected days and times
across devices;
(c) view:
(i) data detailing the minor account holder's total and average daily time spent on the social media
service across devices;
(ii) a list of connected accounts;
(iii) a list of accounts blocked by the minor account holder; and
(iv) the minor account holder's:
(A) privacy settings;
(B) content sensitivity settings; and
(C) direct messaging settings and permissions; and
(d) receive notifications when the minor account holder changes an account setting described in
this subsection (2).

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Parental consent -- data privacy for minor accounts. (1) A social
media company may not allow a minor account holder to change the default data privacy setting described in
[section 5(1)] without first obtaining verifiable parental consent.
(2) A social media company's terms of service related to a minor account holder are presumed to
include an assurance of confidentiality for the minor account holder's personal information.
(3) The presumption of confidentiality in subsection (2) may be overcome if the social media
company obtains verifiable parental consent.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 925.1
(4) The presumption of confidentiality in subsection (2) does not apply to a social media company's
internal use or external sharing of a minor account holder's personal information if the use or sharing is
necessary to:
(a) maintain or analyze the functioning of the social media service;
(b) enable network communications;
(c) personalize the user's experience based on the user's age and location;
(d) display a username chosen by the minor account holder;
(e) obtain age-assurance information as required under [section 4]; or
(f) comply with the requirements of this section or other state or federal laws.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Violations. A violation of [sections 1 through 8] constitutes a violation
under 30-14-103 and may be enforced pursuant to the Montana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer
Protection Act, Title 30, chapter 14.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Appropriation. There is appropriated $25,000 from the general fund to
the department of justice for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of
[sections 1 through 8].

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 8] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 30, chapter 14, part 1, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, part 1 apply
to [sections 1 through 8].

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 925